Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 8 Successor Conservators

29-3-80.
Required showing for resignation of conservator; name of suitable alternate required; notice; order appointing successor conservator.

A conservator or the duly authorized guardian, conservator, or attorney in fact of a conservator acting on behalf of the conservator may resign upon petition to the court showing to the satisfaction of the court that:

The conservator is unable to continue serving due to age, illness, infirmity, or other good cause;

Greater burdens have devolved upon the office of conservator than those that were originally contemplated or should have been contemplated when the conservator was qualified and the additional burdens work a hardship upon the conservator;

Disagreement exists between the minor and the conservator or between the guardian and the conservator in respect to the conservator’s management of the minor’s property, which disagreement and conflict appear to be detrimental to the minor;

The resignation of the conservator will result in or permit substantial financial benefit to the minor; or

The resignation would not be disadvantageous to the minor.

The petition for resignation shall include the name of a suitable person who is willing to accept the conservatorship.

Personal service of the petition for resignation shall be made upon the minor and a guardian ad litem appointed by the court for the minor. Service shall be made by first-class mail to the guardian of the minor, if any, the surety on the conservator’s bond, and to the following relatives of the minor who are persons other than the resigning conservator or the proposed successor conservator:

Any parent of the minor whose parental rights have not been terminated;

If there is no parent of the minor whose parental rights have not been terminated, the adult siblings of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three adult siblings need be served;

If there is no adult sibling of the minor, the grandparents of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three grandparents need be served; or

If there is no grandparent of the minor, any three of the nearest adult relatives of the minor determined according to Code Section 53-2-1.

If, after such hearing as the court deems appropriate, the court is satisfied that the petition for the resignation of the conservator and the appointment of the successor conservator should be granted, the court shall enter an order appointing the successor conservator in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-3-91 and shall accept the conservator’s resignation, subject to the resigning conservator turning over to the successor conservator all property of the minor held by the conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “or” was added following the semicolon at the end of paragraph (c)(3) and “Code Section 53-2-1” was substituted for “53-2-1” in paragraph (c)(4).

29-3-81.
Individuals entitled to notice; appointment of successor conservator; turning over of property.

In the event of the death of a conservator and upon the petition of an interested person or upon the court’s own motion, the court shall appoint a successor conservator. The court shall notify the minor and a guardian ad litem appointed for the minor by personal service. Notice shall be given by first-class mail to the guardian of the minor, if any, the surety on the conservator’s bond, the personal representative of the deceased conservator, if any, and, in the following order of preference, to the following relatives of the minor who are persons other than the proposed successor conservator:

Any parent of the minor whose parental rights have not been terminated;

If there is no parent of the minor whose parental rights have not been terminated, the adult siblings of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three adult siblings need be served;

If there is no adult sibling of the minor, the grandparents of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three grandparents need be served; or

If there is no grandparent of the minor, any three of the nearest adult relatives of the minor determined according to Code Section 53-2-1.

After such hearing as the court deems appropriate, the court shall enter an order appointing a successor conservator in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-3-91 and require the personal representative of the deceased conservator to turn over to the successor conservator all property of the minor held by the conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

29-3-82.
Suspension of conservatorship or imposition of sanctions; power of court; liability of conservator.

Upon the petition of any interested person or whenever it appears to the court that good cause may exist to revoke or suspend the letters of conservatorship or to impose sanctions, the court shall cite the conservator to answer the charge. The court shall investigate the allegations and may require such accounting as the court deems appropriate. The court may appoint a temporary substitute conservator to take possession of and to administer the minor’s property during the investigation.

Upon investigation the court may in its discretion:

Revoke or suspend the letters of conservatorship;

Require additional security;

Require the conservator to appear and submit to a settlement of accounts following the procedure as set forth in Code Section 29-3-71, whether or not the conservator has first resigned or been removed and whether or not a successor conservator has been appointed;

Reduce or deny compensation to the conservator or impose such other sanction or sanctions as the court deems appropriate; and

Issue such other orders which the court deems appropriate under the circumstances of the case.

The revocation or suspension of letters of conservatorship shall not abate any action pending for or against the conservator. The successor conservator shall be made a party to the action in the manner provided in Code Section 9-11-25.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-83.
Cause of action for breach of conservator’s duties; remedies available to minor.

If a conservator commits a breach of fiduciary duty or threatens to commit a breach of fiduciary duty, a minor or an interested person on behalf of the minor shall have a cause of action as appropriate:

To recover damages;

To compel performance of the conservator’s duties;

To enjoin the commission of a breach of fiduciary duty; or

To compel the redress of a breach of fiduciary duty by payment of money or otherwise.

When the minor’s assets are misapplied and can be traced into the hands of persons who have notice of the misapplication, a trust shall attach to the assets.

The provision of remedies for breach of fiduciary duty by this Code section does not prevent resort to any other appropriate remedy provided by statute or common law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-84.
Statute of limitations.

All actions against a conservator, except on a conservator’s bond, shall be brought within six years of the termination of the conservatorship of the minor, except as provided in Code Section 9-3-90.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.